Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,134
Quo warranto; in whose name brought; costs.

When an information is upon the relation of a private individual, it shall be so stated in the complaint and proceedings, and such individual shall be responsible for costs in case they are not adjudged against the defendant. In other cases the title of the cause shall be the same as in a criminal prosecution, and the payment of costs shall be regulated by the same rule.

R.S.1867, Code § 717, p. 518;

R.S.1913, § 8341;

C.S.1922, § 9293;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,125;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,134;

Laws 2002, LB 876, § 48.